Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Chapter 1. Definitions and General Provisions.
§ 4.1-105.
Police power of members, agents and employees of Board.

Members of the Board are vested, and such agents and employees of the Board designated by it shall be vested, with like power to enforce the provisions of (i) this subtitle and the criminal laws of the Commonwealth as is vested in the chief law-enforcement officer of a county, city, or town; (ii) §

3.2-4207

; (iii) §

18.2-371.2

; and (iv) §

58.1-1037

.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-8; 1993, c. 866; 1997, cc. 812, 882; 2000, cc. 880, 901; 2006, c. 695.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, Title 3.1 references were changed to Title 3.2 references to conform to Acts 2008, c. 860.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 880 and 901 are identical, and deleted “and” preceding “(i)” and added “and (iii) §

58.1-1037

.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 695 added clause (ii) and redesignated former clauses (ii) and (iii) as clauses (iii) and (iv).

§ 4.1-106.
Liability of Board members; suits by and against Board.

No Board member may be sued civilly for doing or omitting to do any act in the performance of his duties as prescribed by this subtitle, except by the Commonwealth, and then only in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond. Such proceedings by the Commonwealth shall be instituted and conducted by the Attorney General.

The Board may, in the name of the Commonwealth, be sued in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond to enforce any contract made by it or to recover damages for any breach thereof. The Board may defend the proceedings and may institute proceedings in any court. No such proceedings shall be taken against, or in the names of, the members of the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-12; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-107.
Counsel for members, agents and employees of Board.

If any member, agent, or employee of the Board shall be arrested, indicted or otherwise prosecuted on any charge arising out of any act committed in the discharge of his official duties, the Board chairman may employ special counsel approved by the Attorney General to defend such member, agent, or employee.
The compensation for special counsel employed pursuant to this section, shall, subject to the approval of the Attorney General, be paid in the same manner as other expenses incident to the administration of this subtitle are paid.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-20; 1958, c. 542; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-108.
Hearings; representation by counsel.

Any licensee or applicant for any license granted by the Board shall have the right to be represented by counsel at any Board hearing for which he has received notice.
The licensee or applicant shall not be required to be represented by counsel during such hearing.
Any officer or director of a corporation may examine, cross-examine and question witnesses; present evidence on behalf of the corporation; and draw conclusions and make arguments before the Board or hearing officers without being in violation of the provisions of §

54.1-3904

.

History.

1989, c. 266, § 4-10.1; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-109.
Hearings; allowances to witnesses.

Witnesses subpoenaed to appear on behalf of the Board shall be entitled to the same allowance for expenses as witnesses for the Commonwealth in criminal cases in accordance with §

17.1-611

.
Such allowances shall be paid out of the fund from which other costs incurred by the Board are paid upon certification to the Comptroller.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-10; 1954, c. 709; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-110.
Purchase orders of Board for alcoholic beverages.

Every order of the Board for the purchase of alcoholic beverages shall be authenticated by the chairman or by a member or agent of the Board, authorized by the Board to authenticate such orders. No order shall be binding unless so authenticated.

A duplicate of every such order shall be kept on file in the office of the Board in accordance with retention regulations established pursuant to the Virginia Public Records Act (§

42.1-76

et seq.).

All cancellations of orders made by the Board shall be authenticated in the same manner and a duplicate kept as required by subsection B.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-17; 1972, c. 138; 1984, c. 469; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-111.
Regulations of Board.

The Board may promulgate reasonable regulations, not inconsistent with this subtitle or the general laws of the Commonwealth, which it deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this subtitle and to prevent the illegal manufacture, bottling, sale, distribution, and transportation of alcoholic beverages. The Board may amend or repeal such regulations. Such regulations shall be promulgated, amended or repealed in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and shall have the effect of law.

The Board shall promulgate regulations that:

Prescribe what hours and on what days alcoholic beverages shall not be sold by licensees or consumed on any licensed premises, including a provision that mixed beverages may be sold only at such times as wine and beer may be sold.

Require mixed beverage caterer licensees to notify the Board in advance of any event to be served by such licensee.

Maintain the reasonable separation of retailer interests from those of the manufacturers, bottlers, brokers, importers and wholesalers in accordance with §

4.1-216

and in consideration of the established trade customs, quantity and value of the articles or services involved; prevent undue competitive domination of any person by any other person engaged in the manufacture, distribution and sale at retail or wholesale of alcoholic beverages in the Commonwealth; and promote reasonable accommodation of arm’s length business transactions.

Establish requirements for the form, content, and retention of all records and accounts, including the (i) reporting and collection of taxes required by §

4.1-236

and (ii) the sale of alcoholic beverages in kegs, by all licensees.

Require retail licensees to file an appeal from any hearing decision rendered by a hearing officer within 30 days of the date the notice of the decision is sent. The notice shall be sent to the licensee at the address on record with the Board by certified mail, return receipt requested, and by regular mail.

Prescribe the terms and conditions under which persons who collect or trade designer or vintage spirit bottles may sell such bottles at auction, provided that (i) the auction is conducted in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 6 (§

54.1-600

et seq.) of Title 54.1 and (ii) the bottles are unopened and the manufacturers’ seals, marks, or stamps affixed to the bottles are intact.

Prescribe the terms and conditions under which credit or debit cards may be accepted from licensees for purchases at government stores, including provision for the collection, where appropriate, of related fees, penalties, and service charges.

Require that banquet licensees in charge of public events as defined by Board regulations report to the Board the income and expenses associated with the public event on a form prescribed by the Board when the banquet licensee engages another person to organize, conduct, or operate the event on behalf of the banquet licensee. Such regulations shall be applicable only to public events where alcoholic beverages are being sold.

Provide alternative methods for licensees to maintain and store business records that are subject to Board inspection, including methods for Board-approved electronic and off-site storage.

Require off-premises retail licensees to place any premixed alcoholic energy drinks containing one-half of one percent or more of alcohol by volume in the same location where wine and beer are available for sale within the licensed premises.

Prescribe the terms and conditions under which mixed beverage licensees may infuse, store, and sell flavored distilled spirits, including a provision that limits infusion containers to a maximum of 20 liters.

Prescribe the schedule of proration for refunded license taxes to licensees who qualify pursuant to subsection C of §

4.1-232

.

Establish reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions on outdoor advertising of alcoholic beverages, not inconsistent with the provisions of this subtitle, so that such advertising does not encourage or otherwise promote the consumption of alcoholic beverages by persons to whom alcoholic beverages may not be lawfully sold. Such regulations shall:

Restrict outdoor advertising of alcoholic beverages in publicly visible locations consistent with (i) the general prohibition against tied interests between retail licensees and manufacturers or wholesale licensees as provided in §§

4.1-215

and

4.1-216

; (ii) the prohibition against manufacturer control of wholesale licensees as set forth in §

4.1-223

and Board regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and (iii) the general prohibition against cooperative advertising between manufacturers, wholesalers, or importers and retail licensees as set forth in Board regulation; and

Permit (i) any outdoor signage or advertising not otherwise prohibited by this subtitle and (ii) the display of outdoor alcoholic beverage advertising on lawfully erected billboard signs regulated under Chapter 12 (§

33.2-1200

et seq.) of Title 33.2 where such signs are located on commercial real estate as defined in §

55.1-1100

, but only in accordance with this subtitle.

Prescribe the terms and conditions under which a licensed brewery may manufacture beer pursuant to an agreement with a brand owner not under common control with the manufacturing brewery and sell and deliver the beer so manufactured to the brand owner. The regulations shall require that (i) the brand owner be an entity appropriately licensed as a brewery or beer wholesaler, (ii) a written agreement be entered into by the parties, and (iii) records as deemed appropriate by the Board are maintained by the parties.

Prescribe the terms for any “happy hour” conducted by on-premises licensees. Such regulations shall permit on-premises licensees to advertise any alcoholic beverage products featured during a happy hour and any pricing related to such happy hour. Such regulations shall not prohibit on-premises licensees from using creative marketing techniques in such advertisements, provided that such techniques do not tend to induce overconsumption or consumption by minors.

Permit retail on-premises licensees to give a gift of one alcoholic beverage to a patron or one bottle of wine to a group of two or more patrons, provided that (i) such gifts only are made to individuals to whom such products may lawfully be sold and (ii) only one such gift is given during any 24-hour period and subject to any Board limitations on the frequency of such gifts.

Permit the sale of beer and cider for off-premises consumption in resealable growlers made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other materials approved by the Board, or other resealable containers approved by the Board, with a maximum capacity of 128 fluid ounces or, for metric-sized containers, four liters.

Permit the sale of wine for off-premises consumption in resealable growlers made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other materials approved by the Board, or other resealable containers approved by the Board, with a maximum capacity of 64 fluid ounces or, for metric-sized containers, two liters. Wine growlers may be used only by persons licensed to sell wine for both on-premises and off-premises consumption or by gourmet shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license. Growlers sold by gourmet shops shall be labeled with (i) the manufacturer’s name or trade name, (ii) the place of production, (iii) the net contents in fluid ounces, and (iv) the name and address of the retailer.

Permit the sale of wine, cider, and beer by retailers licensed to sell beer and wine for both on-premises and off-premises consumption, or by gourmet shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license for off-premises consumption in sealed containers made of metal or other materials approved by the Board with a maximum capacity of 32 fluid ounces or, for metric-sized containers, one liter, provided that the alcoholic beverage is placed in the container following an order from the consumer.

Permit mixed beverage licensees to premix containers of sangria and other mixed alcoholic beverages and to serve such alcoholic beverages in pitchers, subject to size and quantity limitations established by the Board.

Establish and make available to all licensees and permittees for which on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages is allowed and employees of such licensees and permittees who serve as a bartender or otherwise sell, serve, or dispense alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption a bar bystander training module, which shall include (i) information that enables licensees, permittees, and their employees to recognize situations that may lead to sexual assault and (ii) intervention strategies to prevent such situations from culminating in sexual assault.

Require mixed beverage licensees, except for mixed beverage casino licensees, to have food, cooked or prepared on the licensed premises, available for on-premises consumption until at least 30 minutes prior to an establishment’s closing. Such food shall be available in all areas of the licensed premises in which spirits are sold or served.

Prescribe the terms and conditions under which the Board may suspend the privilege of a mixed beverage licensee to purchase spirits from the Board upon such licensee’s failure to submit any records or other documents necessary to verify the licensee’s compliance with applicable minimum food sale requirements within 30 days of the date such records or documents are due.

The Board may promulgate regulations that:

Provide for the waiver of the license tax for an applicant for a banquet license, such waiver to be based on (i) the amount of alcoholic beverages to be provided by the applicant, (ii) the not-for-profit status of the applicant, and (iii) the condition that no profits are to be generated from the event. For the purposes of clause (ii), the applicant shall submit with the application, an affidavit certifying its not-for-profit status. The granting of such waiver shall be limited to two events per year for each applicant.

Establish limitations on the quantity and value of any gifts of alcoholic beverages made in the course of any business entertainment pursuant to subdivision A 22 of §

4.1-325

or subsection C of §

4.1-325.2

.

Provide incentives to licensees with a proven history of compliance with state and federal laws and regulations to encourage licensees to conduct their business and related activities in a manner that is beneficial to the Commonwealth.

Board regulations shall be uniform in their application, except those relating to hours of sale for licensees.

Courts shall take judicial notice of Board regulations.

The Board’s power to regulate shall be broadly construed.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 4-11, 4-36; 1968, c. 7, §§ 4-98.5, 4-98.14; 1974, c. 460; 1982, c. 145; 1991, c. 690; 1992, c. 220; 1993, cc. 433, 866; 1997, c. 40; 1998, c. 301; 1999, cc. 98, 641; 2003, c. 856; 2008, c. 513; 2009, c. 122; 2010, c. 481; 2011, c. 728; 2012, cc. 376, 760, 818; 2015, cc. 404, 412; 2017, cc. 160, 743, 744; 2019, cc. 7, 29, 706; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114; 2022, cc. 589, 590.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, c. 433 amended former § 4-11, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, c. 433 has been given effect in this section as set out above. In accordance with c. 433, former subsections (a) through (c) were redesignated as present subsections A through F and subsection C was added.

A reference in this section was updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts
2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts
2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “55.1-1100” for “55-526.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cl. 4 provides: “That any person licensed to sell wine or beer for on-premises consumption may sell such wine or beer to persons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for off-premises consumption until January 1, 2022, provided that such wine or beer is sold in a (i) container upon which the original seal or closure has not been broken; (ii) growler made of glass, ceramic, metal, or other material approved by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority (the Board); or (iii) reusable, resealable container approved by the Board. Such on-premises licensee, as well as persons licensed to sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption, may deliver wine or beer that it is authorized to sell to consumers within the Commonwealth without obtaining a delivery permit until January 1, 2022, subject to the following conditions: (a) deliveries shall be performed by (1) the licensee, (2) an agent, officer, director, shareholder, or employee of the licensee, or (3) an independent contractor of the licensee, provided that only one individual takes possession of the wine or beer during the course of the delivery and the licensee has entered into a written agreement with the independent contractor establishing that the licensee is vicariously liable for any administrative violations of this enactment or
§

4.1-304

of the Code of Virginia committed by the independent contractor relating to any deliveries made on behalf of the licensee; (b) deliveries may be made without obtaining the recipient’s signature, provided that the person making the delivery records the recipient’s full name and the method used to verify that the recipient is 21 years of age or older; (c) the delivery shall be refused when the recipient appears to be younger than 21 years of age and refuses to present valid identification; (d) the licensee shall affix a conspicuous notice in 16-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine or beer that states ‘CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON 21 YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY’ and includes the licensee number; and (e) no more than four cases of wine or beer may be delivered to any person at one time unless the licensee provides notice to the Board at least one business day prior to the delivery, which notice shall include the name and address of the intended recipient.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 8, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That on or after July 1, 2020, the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may issue mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by bus, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier. The state license fee for any such license granted prior to January 1, 2022, shall be $190. Such license shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license. For the purposes of this enactment, ‘bus’ means a motor vehicle that (i) is operated by a common carrier licensed under Chapter 20 ( §

46.2-2000

et seq.) of Title 46.2 of the Code of Virginia to transport passengers for compensation over the highways of the Commonwealth on regular or irregular routes of not less than 100 miles, (ii) seats no more than 24 passengers, (iii) is 40 feet in length or longer, (iv) offers wireless Internet services, (v) is equipped with charging stations at every seat for cellular phones or other portable devices, and (vi) during the transportation of passengers, is staffed by an attendant who has satisfied all training requirements set forth in Title 4.1 of the Code of Virginia or Board regulation.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 98, effective March 15, 1999, in subdivision B 5, substituted “return” for “returned” and added subdivision B 7.

The 1999 amendment by c. 641 added subdivision
B 8.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 856 in subdivision 5, substituted “30” for “thirty”; added the subdivision C 1 designation; added subdivision C 2; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 513 added subdivision B 9.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 122 added subdivision B 10.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 481 added subdivision B 11.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 728, effective March 26, 2011, added subdivisions B 12 and 13.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 376 added subdivision B 14.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 760 and 818, effective April 18, 2012, are identical and deleted “and provided that no outdoor alcoholic beverage advertising shall be placed within 500 feet of a church or synagogue; public, private, or parochial school, college, or university; public or private playground or similar recreational facility; or residentially zoned property. Nothing in this subdivision b shall be construed to authorize outdoor alcoholic beverage advertising on property zoned agricultural or residential, or on any unzoned property. Nor shall this subdivision b be construed to authorize the erection of new outdoor advertising that would be prohibited under state law or local ordinance” at the end of B 13 b.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 404 inserted “including a provision that limits infusion containers to a maximum of 20 liters” at the end of subdivision B 11 and added subdivisions B 15 through B 20.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 added subdivision C 3.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 160 inserted “cider” in subdivision B 19.

The 2017 amendment by c. 743 added subdivision B 21.

The 2017 amendment by c. 744 added subdivision B 22.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 7 and 29 are identical, and in subdivision B 15, substituted “and any pricing” for “but prohibit the advertising of any pricing” in the first sentence and added the third sentence.

The 2019 amendment by c. 706 added subdivision B 23.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in subdivision B 18, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licensees” in the second sentence and “shops” for “shop licensees” in the last sentence; in subdivision B 19, substituted “shops granted a retail off-premises wine and beer license” for “shop licenses”; and made a stylistic change.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 589 and 590 are identical, and inserted “except for mixed beverage casino licensees” in the first sentence of subdivision B 22.

Law Review.

For an article, “Administrative Procedure,” see 31 U. Rich. L. Rev. 907 (1997).

For comment, “Citizens United vs. Central Hudson: A Rationale for Simplifying and Clarifying the First Amendment’s Protections for Nonpolitical Advertisements,” see 19 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 213 (2011).

For Essay, “The Grapes of Wrath: Encouraging Fruitful Collaborations Between Local Governments and Farm Wineries in the Commonwealth,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (2013).

For comment, “Commercial Speech Doctrine and Virginia’s ‘Thirsty Thursday’ Ban,” see 27 Geo. Mason U. Civ. Rts. L.J. 207 (2017).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7B M.J. Evidence, § 16.

§ 4.1-112.
Regulations relating to transportation of beer and wine coolers.

The Board may promulgate regulations relating to the transportation of beer and wine coolers through the Commonwealth, including a prohibition against the direct shipment of beer or wine coolers from points outside the Commonwealth to installations of the United States armed forces located within the Commonwealth for resale on such installation.

History.

1988, c. 261, § 4-144; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-112.1.
Repealed by Acts 2007, cc. 99 and 799, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to direct shipment of wine and beer for holders of shipper’s licenses, see §

4.1-209.1

. As to regulation of delivery of wine and beer, see §

4.1-212.1

.

Editor’s note.

Former §

4.1-112.1

, which authorized direct shipments of beer and wine for holders of wine and beer shippers’ licenses and regulated such shipments, was derived from 2003, cc. 1029, 1030; 2006, c. 845.

§ 4.1-112.2.
Outdoor advertising; limitations; variances; compliance with Title 33.2.

No outdoor alcoholic beverage advertising shall be placed within 500 linear feet on the same side of the road, and parallel to such road, measured from the nearest edge of the sign face upon which the advertisement is placed to the nearest edge of a building or structure located on the real property of (i) a church, synagogue, mosque or other place of religious worship; (ii) a public, private, or parochial school or an institution of higher education; (iii) a public or private playground or similar recreational facility; or (iv) a dwelling used for residential use.

However, (i) if there is no building or structure on a playground or similar recreational facility, the measurement shall be from the nearest edge of the sign face upon which the advertisement is placed to the property line of such playground or similar recreational facility and (ii) if a public or private school providing grade K through 12 education is located across the road from a sign, the measurement shall be from the nearest edge of the sign face upon which the advertisement is placed to the nearest edge of a building or structure located on such real property across the road.

If, at the time the advertisement was displayed, the advertisement was more than 500 feet from (i) a church, synagogue, mosque or other place of religious worship; (ii) a public, private, or parochial school or an institution of higher education; (iii) a public or private playground or similar recreational facility; or (iv) a dwelling used for residential use, but the circumstances change such that the advertiser would otherwise be in violation of subsection A, the Board shall permit the advertisement to remain as displayed for the remainder of the term of any written advertising contract, but in no event more than one year from the date of the change in circumstances.

The Board may grant a permit authorizing a variance from the distance requirements of this section upon a finding that the placement of alcoholic beverage advertising on a sign will not unduly expose children to alcoholic beverage advertising.

Provided such signs are in compliance with local ordinances, the distance and zoning restrictions contained in this section shall not apply to:

Signs placed by licensees upon the property on which the licensed premises are located; or

Directional signs placed by manufacturers or wholesalers with advertising limited to trade names, brand names, the terms “distillery,” “brewery,” “farm winery,” or “winery,” and tour information.

The distance and zoning restrictions contained in this section shall not apply to any sign that is included in the Integrated Directional Sign Program administered by the Virginia Department of Transportation or its agents.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize billboard signs containing outdoor alcoholic beverage advertising on property zoned agricultural or residential, or on any unzoned property. Nor shall this section be construed to authorize the erection of new billboard signs containing outdoor advertising that would be prohibited under state law or local ordinance.

All lawfully erected outdoor alcoholic beverage signs shall comply with the provisions of this subtitle, Board regulations, and Chapter 12 (§

33.2-1200

et seq.) of Title 33.2 and regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the Commonwealth Transportation Board. Further, any outdoor alcoholic beverage directional sign located or to be located on highway rights of way shall also be governed by and comply with the Integrated Directional Sign Program administered by the Virginia Department of Transportation or its agents.

History.

2012, cc. 760, 818.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 760 and 818, cl. 3 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [April 18, 2012].”

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
“or an institution of higher education” was substituted for “college, or university” in subsection A to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission,
in subsection C, clause (ii), “or an institution of higher education” was substituted for
“college, or university” to conform to Acts 2016, c. 588.

§ 4.1-113.
Board not to regulate certain advertising in the interiors of retail establishments.

The Board shall not regulate the use of advertising materials or decorations within the premises of a retail on-premises licensee (i) where such advertising materials or decorations cannot be seen from the street or roadway outside of the licensed establishment and (ii) if the retail establishment is located within an enclosed area with no street or roadway, where such advertising or decorations cannot be seen more than fifteen feet from the nearest window.

This section shall not restrict the regulation of advertising materials or decorations containing references to an alcoholic beverage brand or manufacturer, except the Board shall not regulate such references contained in works of art.

This section shall not restrict or deny the Board its authority pursuant to §§

4.1-216

,

4.1-317

, and subdivisions 11, 12, 13, 16, and 21 of §

4.1-325

, nor shall this section authorize any manufacturer, bottler, wholesaler or importer of any alcoholic beverages to sell, rent, lend, buy for, or give to any retailer any advertising materials or decorations under any circumstances otherwise prohibited by law.

History.

1981, c. 574, § 4-69.2; 1993, c. 866.

§ 4.1-113.1.
Outdoor advertising; compliance with Title 33.2.

All lawfully erected outdoor alcoholic beverage signs shall comply with the provisions of this subtitle, Board regulations, and Chapter 12 (§

33.2-1200

et seq.) of Title 33.2 and regulations adopted pursuant thereto by the Commonwealth Transportation Board. Further, any outdoor alcoholic beverage directional sign located or to be located on highway rights-of-way shall also be governed by and comply with the Integrated Directional Sign Program administered by the Virginia Department of Transportation or its agents.

History.

2012, cc. 326, 618.

Cross references.

As to adjustment or relocation of certain billboard signs, see §

33.2-1230

.

Editor’s note.

References in this section were updated at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission to conform to the recodification of Title 33.2 by Acts 2014, c. 805, effective October 1, 2014.